Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.210

Election reserve fund—Accumulation of fund—Transfers.

The limits placed upon the amount to be accumulated in the current expense fund shall not affect the election reserve fund nor shall the existence of the election reserve fund affect the amount which may be accumulated in the current expense fund, nor shall any unexpended balance in the election reserve fund at the end of any budget year revert to the current expense fund but shall be carried forward in the election reserve fund to be used for the purposes for which the fund was created: PROVIDED, That at a regular session, the county commissioners may transfer any surplus in said fund to the current expense fund, if they deem it expedient to do so.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.33.210. Prior: 1955 c 48 s 2.]